Nevada, session 83, SB339.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 116 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. The Division shall investigate and audit all financial
accounts related to an association if the Division has reasonable
cause to believe that the accounts or records of the association
have not been properly maintained and the Division determines
that the investigation and audit are reasonably necessary to assist
the Division in administering or enforcing the provisions of this
chapter and any other statute that the Division is charged with
administering or enforcing.
Sec. 3. 1. The Division shall prepare a report on the
background of a candidate nominated for membership to an
executive board pursuant to NRS 116.31034.
2. A candidate shall submit an application to the Division for
the preparation of the report not later than 3 days after the
nomination of the candidate.
3. The application must be made on a form prescribed by the
Division.
-
*SB339*

– 3 –
4. The Division shall provide to the candidate a certified copy
of the report on the background of a candidate.
Sec. 4. 1. The Division shall by regulation establish a
training and orientation program for members of executive
boards, which must include, without limitation, information
concerning the powers and duties of the members.
2. Each member of an executive board shall, not later than 6
months after election or appointment, complete the training and
orientation program described in subsection 1.
Sec. 5. NRS 116.1203 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.1203 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, if a planned community contains no more than 12 units and is
not subject to any developmental rights, it is subject only to NRS
116.1106 and 116.1107 unless the declaration provides that this
entire chapter is applicable.
2. The provisions of NRS 116.12065 and the definitions set
forth in NRS 116.005 to 116.095, inclusive, to the extent that the
definitions are necessary to construe any of those provisions, apply
to a residential planned community containing more than 6 units.
3. Except for NRS 116.3104, 116.31043, 116.31046 and
116.31138, the provisions of NRS 116.3101 to 116.350, inclusive,
and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act, and the definitions set forth in
NRS 116.005 to 116.095, inclusive, to the extent that such
definitions are necessary in construing any of those provisions,
apply to a residential planned community containing more than 6
units.
Sec. 6. NRS 116.31034 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.31034 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 of
NRS 116.212, not later than the termination of any period of
declarant’s control, the units’ owners shall elect an executive board
of at least three members, all of whom must be units’ owners. The
executive board shall elect the officers of the association. Unless
the governing documents provide otherwise, the officers of the
association are not required to be units’ owners. The members of the
executive board and the officers of the association shall take office
upon election.
2. The term of office of a member of the executive board may
not exceed 3 years, except for members who are appointed by the
declarant. Unless the governing documents provide otherwise, there
is no limitation on the number of terms that a person may serve as a
member of the executive board.
3. The governing documents of the association must provide
for terms of office that are staggered in such a manner that, to the
extent possible, an equal number of members of the executive board
-
*SB339*

– 4 –
are elected at each election. The provisions of this subsection do not
apply to:
(a) Members of the executive board who are appointed by the
declarant; and
(b) Members of the executive board who serve a term of 1 year
or less.
4. Not less than 30 days before the preparation of a ballot for
the election of members of the executive board, the secretary or
other officer specified in the bylaws of the association shall cause
notice to be given to each unit’s owner of the unit’s owner’s
eligibility to serve as a member of the executive board. Each unit’s
owner who is qualified to serve as a member of the executive board
may have his or her name placed on the ballot along with the names
of the nominees selected by the members of the executive board or a
nominating committee established by the association.
5. Before the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws
of the association causes notice to be given to each unit’s owner of
his or her eligibility to serve as a member of the executive board
pursuant to subsection 4, the executive board may determine that if,
at the closing of the prescribed period for nominations for
membership on the executive board, the number of candidates
nominated for membership on the executive board is equal to or less
than the number of members to be elected to the executive board at
the election, then:
(a) The association will not prepare or provide any ballots to
units’ owners pursuant to this section; and
(b) The nominated candidates shall be deemed to be duly elected
to the executive board at the meeting of the units’ owners at which
the ballots would have been counted pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 15.
6. If the executive board makes the determination set forth in
subsection 5, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws of
the association shall disclose the determination and the provisions of
subsection 5 with the notice given pursuant to subsection 4.
7. If, at the closing of the prescribed period for nominations for
membership on the executive board, the number of candidates
nominated for membership on the executive board is less than
the number of members to be elected to the executive board at the
election, the executive board may fill the remaining vacancies on the
executive board by appointment of the executive board at a meeting
of the executive board held after the candidates are elected pursuant
to subsection 5. Any such person appointed to the executive board
shall serve as a member of the executive board until the next
regularly scheduled election of members of the executive board. An
executive board member elected to a previously appointed position
-
*SB339*

– 5 –
which was temporarily filled by board appointment pursuant to this
subsection may only be elected to fulfill the remainder of that term.
8. If, at the closing of the prescribed period for nominations for
membership on the executive board described in subsection 5, the
number of candidates nominated for membership on the executive
board is greater than the number of members to be elected to the
executive board, then the association shall:
(a) Prepare and provide ballots to the units’ owners pursuant to
this section; and
(b) Conduct an election for membership on the executive board
pursuant to this section.
9. Each person who is nominated as a candidate for
membership on the executive board pursuant to subsection 4 must:
(a) Make a good faith effort to disclose any financial, business,
professional or personal relationship or interest that would result or
would appear to a reasonable person to result in a potential conflict
of interest for the candidate if the candidate were to be elected to
serve as a member of the executive board; [and]
(b) Disclose whether the candidate is a member in good
standing. For the purposes of this paragraph, a candidate shall not be
deemed to be in “good standing” if the candidate has any unpaid and
past due assessments or construction penalties that are required to be
paid to the association [.] ; and
(c) Provide to the association a certified copy of the report
prepared by the Division pursuant to section 3 of this act.
 The candidate must make all disclosures required pursuant to this
subsection in writing to the association with his or her candidacy
information. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
association shall distribute the disclosures [,] and a copy of the
report on behalf of the candidate, to each member of the association
with the ballot or, in the event ballots are not prepared and provided
pursuant to subsection 5, in the next regular mailing of the
association. The association is not obligated to distribute any
disclosure pursuant to this subsection if the disclosure contains
information that is believed to be defamatory, libelous or profane.
10. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 11 and 12,
unless a person is appointed by the declarant:
(a) A person may not be a candidate for or member of the
executive board or an officer of the association if:
(1) The person resides in a unit with, is married to, is
domestic partners with, or is related by blood, adoption or marriage
within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity to another person
who is also a member of the executive board or is an officer of the
association;
-
*SB339*

– 6 –
(2) The person stands to gain any personal profit or
compensation of any kind from a matter before the executive board
of the association; or
(3) The person, the person’s spouse or the person’s parent or
child, by blood, marriage or adoption, performs the duties of a
community manager for that association.
(b) A person may not be a candidate for or member of the
executive board of a master association or an officer of that master
association if the person, the person’s spouse or the person’s parent
or child, by blood, marriage or adoption, performs the duties of a
community manager for:
(1) That master association; or
(2) Any association that is subject to the governing
documents of that master association.
11. A person, other than a person appointed by the declarant,
who owns 75 percent or more of the units in an association may:
(a) Be a candidate for or member of the executive board or an
officer of the association; and
(b) Reside in a unit with, be married to, be domestic partners
with, or be related by blood, adoption or marriage within the third
degree of consanguinity or affinity to another person who is also a
member of the executive board or is an officer of the association,
 unless the person owning 75 percent or more of the units in the
association and the other person would constitute a majority of the
total number of seats on the executive board.
12. A person, other than a person appointed by the declarant,
may:
(a) Be a candidate for or member of the executive board; and
(b) Reside in a unit with, be married to, be domestic partners
with, or be related by blood, adoption or marriage within the third
degree of consanguinity or affinity to another person who is also a
member of the executive board or is an officer of the association,
 if the number of candidates nominated for membership on the
executive board is less than or equal to the number of members to be
elected to the executive board.
13. If a person is not eligible to be a candidate for or member
of the executive board or an officer of the association pursuant to
any provision of this chapter, the association:
(a) Must not place his or her name on the ballot; and
(b) Must prohibit such a person from serving as a member of the
executive board or an officer of the association.
14. An officer, employee, agent or director of a corporate
owner of a unit, a trustee or designated beneficiary of a trust that
owns a unit, a partner of a partnership that owns a unit, a member or
manager of a limited-liability company that owns a unit, and a
-
*SB339*

– 7 –
fiduciary of an estate that owns a unit may be an officer of the
association or a member of the executive board. In all events where
the person serving or offering to serve as an officer of the
association or a member of the executive board is not the record
owner, the person shall file proof in the records of the association
that:
(a) The person is associated with the corporate owner, trust,
partnership, limited-liability company or estate as required by this
subsection; and
(b) Identifies the unit or units owned by the corporate owner,
trust, partnership, limited-liability company or estate.
15. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 or NRS
116.311 or 116.31105, the election of any member of the executive
board must be conducted by secret ballot in the following manner:
(a) The secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws of the
association shall cause a secret paper or electronic ballot to be
provided to each unit’s owner and:
(1) If a paper ballot is provided, shall send the ballot and a
return envelope, prepaid by United States mail, to the mailing
address of each unit within the common-interest community or to
any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit’s owner;
or
(2) If an electronic ballot is provided, shall provide the ballot
or make the ballot available by electronic means to each unit’s
owner.
(b) Each unit’s owner must be provided with at least 15 days
after the date the secret ballot is mailed, provided or made available
to the unit’s owner to return the secret ballot to the association by
physical or electronic means.
(c) A quorum is not required for the election of any member of
the executive board.
(d) Only the secret ballots that the association receives by
physical or electronic means may be counted to determine the
outcome of the election.
(e) At the meeting of the units’ owners held pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 116.3108, the secret ballots physically received
by the association must be opened and counted and the results of the
secret ballots received by the association by electronic means must
be reviewed, announced and entered into the record. A quorum is
not required to be present when the secret ballots physically
received by the association are opened and counted or the results of
the secret ballots received by the association by electronic means are
reviewed, announced and entered into the record at the meeting.
(f) The incumbent members of the executive board and each
person whose name is placed on the ballot as a candidate for
-
*SB339*

– 8 –
membership on the executive board may not possess, be given
access to or participate in the opening or counting of the secret
ballots that the association physically receives, or the collection of
data regarding the secret ballots that the association receives by
electronic means, before those secret ballots have been opened and
counted or reviewed, announced and entered into the record, as
applicable, at a meeting of the association.
16. An association shall not adopt any rule or regulation that
has the effect of prohibiting or unreasonably interfering with a
candidate in the candidate’s campaign for election as a member of
the executive board, except that the candidate’s campaign may be
limited to 90 days before the date that ballots are required to be
returned to the association.
17. A candidate who has submitted a nomination form for
election as a member of the executive board may request that the
association or its agent either:
(a) Send before the date of the election and at the association’s
expense, to the mailing address of each unit within the common-
interest community or to any other mailing address designated in
writing by the unit’s owner a candidate informational statement. The
candidate informational statement:
(1) Must be no longer than a single, typed page;
(2) Must not contain any defamatory, libelous or profane
information; and
(3) May be sent with a secret ballot mailed pursuant to
subsection 15 or in a separate mailing; or
(b) To allow the candidate to communicate campaign material
directly to the units’ owners, provide to the candidate, in paper
format at a cost not to exceed 25 cents per page for the first 10 pages
and 10 cents per page thereafter, in the format of a compact disc at a
cost of not more than $5 or by electronic mail at no cost:
(1) A list of the mailing address of each unit, which must not
include the names of the units’ owners or the name of any tenant of
a unit’s owner; or
(2) If the members of the association are owners of time
shares within a time share plan created pursuant to chapter 119A of
NRS and:
(I) The voting rights of those owners are exercised by
delegates or representatives pursuant to NRS 116.31105, the mailing
address of the delegates or representatives.
(II) The voting rights of those owners are not exercised by
delegates or representatives, the mailing address of the association
established pursuant to NRS 119A.520. If the mailing address of the
association is provided to the candidate pursuant to this sub-
subparagraph, the association must send to each owner of a time
-
*SB339*

– 9 –
share within the time share plan the campaign material provided by
the candidate. If the campaign material will be sent by mail, the
candidate who provides the campaign material must provide to the
association a separate copy of the campaign material for each owner
and must pay the actual costs of mailing before the campaign
material is mailed. If the campaign material will be sent by
electronic transmission, the candidate must provide to the
association one copy of the campaign material in an electronic
format.
 The information provided pursuant to this paragraph must not
include the name of any unit’s owner or any tenant of a unit’s
owner. If a candidate who makes a request for the information
described in this paragraph fails or refuses to provide a written
statement signed by the candidate which states that the candidate is
making the request to allow the candidate to communicate campaign
material directly to units’ owners and that the candidate will not use
the information for any other purpose, the association or its agent
may refuse the request.
18. An association and its directors, officers, employees and
agents are immune from criminal or civil liability for any act or
omission which arises out of the publication or disclosure of any
information related to any person and which occurs in the course of
carrying out any duties required pursuant to subsection 17.
19. Each member of the executive board shall, within 90 days
after his or her appointment or election, certify in writing to the
association, on a form prescribed by the Administrator, that the
member [has read] :
(a) Has read and understands the governing documents of the
association and the provisions of this chapter to the best of his or her
ability [.] ; and
(b) Acknowledges that the member must complete the training
and orientation program as required by section 4 of this act.
20. The Administrator may require the association to submit a
copy of the certification of each member of the executive board of
that association at the time the association registers with the
Ombudsman pursuant to NRS 116.31158.
Sec. 7. NRS 116.31152 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.31152 1. The executive board shall [:] , at least
annually:
(a) [At least once every 5 years, cause] Cause to be conducted a
study of the reserves required to repair, replace and restore the
major components of the common elements and any other portion of
the common-interest community that the association is obligated to
maintain, repair, replace or restore;
-
*SB339*

– 10 –
(b) [At least annually, review] Review the results of that study to
determine whether those reserves are sufficient [;] to fund the cost
projected for the fiscal year to repair, replace or restore the major
components of the common elements and any other portion of the
common-interest community that the association is obligated to
maintain, repair, replace or restore; and
(c) [At least annually, make] Make any adjustments to the
association’s funding plan which the executive board deems
necessary to provide adequate funding for the required reserves.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the study of
the reserves required by subsection 1 must be conducted by a person
who holds a permit issued pursuant to chapter 116A of NRS. If the
common-interest community contains 20 or fewer units and is
located in a county whose population is less than 55,000, the study
of the reserves required by subsection 1 may be conducted by any
person whom the executive board deems qualified to conduct the
study.
3. The study of the reserves must include, without limitation:
(a) A summary of an inspection of the major components of the
common elements and any other portion of the common-interest
community that the association is obligated to maintain, repair,
replace or restore;
(b) An identification of the major components of the common
elements and any other portion of the common-interest community
that the association is obligated to maintain, repair, replace or
restore which have a remaining useful life of less than 30 years;
(c) An estimate of the remaining useful life of each major
component of the common elements and any other portion of the
common-interest community that the association is obligated to
maintain, repair, replace or restore identified pursuant to
paragraph (b);
(d) An estimate of the cost of maintenance, repair, replacement
or restoration of each major component of the common elements
and any other portion of the common-interest community identified
pursuant to paragraph (b) during and at the end of its useful life; and
(e) An estimate of the total annual assessment that may be
necessary to cover the cost of maintaining, repairing, replacement or
restoration of the major components of the common elements and
any other portion of the common-interest community identified
pursuant to paragraph (b), after subtracting the reserves of the
association as of the date of the study, and an estimate of the
funding plan that may be necessary to provide adequate funding for
the required reserves.
4. A summary of the study of the reserves required by
subsection 1 must be submitted to the Division not later than
-
*SB339*

– 11 –
45 days after the date that the executive board adopts the results of
the study.
5. If a common-interest community was developed as part of a
planned unit development pursuant to chapter 278A of NRS and is
subject to an agreement with a city or county to receive credit
against the amount of the residential construction tax that is imposed
pursuant to NRS 278.4983 and 278.4985, the association that is
organized for the common-interest community may use the money
from that credit for the repair, replacement or restoration of park
facilities and related improvements if:
(a) The park facilities and related improvements are identified as
major components of the common elements of the association; and
(b) The association is obligated to repair, replace or restore the
park facilities and related improvements in accordance with the
study of the reserves required by subsection 1.
Sec. 8. NRS 116.4117 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.4117 1. Subject to the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, if a declarant, community manager or any other person
subject to this chapter fails to comply with any of its provisions or
any provision of the declaration or bylaws, any person or class of
persons suffering actual damages from the failure to comply may
bring a civil action for damages or other appropriate relief.
2. [Subject to the requirements set forth in NRS 38.310 and
except] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 116.3111, a civil
action for damages or other appropriate relief for a failure or refusal
to comply with any provision of this chapter or the governing
documents of an association may be brought:
(a) By the association against:
(1) A declarant;
(2) A community manager; or
(3) A unit’s owner.
(b) By a unit’s owner against:
(1) The association;
(2) A declarant; or
(3) Another unit’s owner of the association.
(c) By a class of units’ owners constituting at least 10 percent of
the total number of voting members of the association against a
community manager.
3. A civil action brought for damages pursuant to subsection
1 must be commenced in the justice court and adjudicated in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 73 of NRS relating to
small claims.
4. Members of the executive board are not personally liable to
the victims of crimes occurring on the property.
-
*SB339*

– 12 –
[4.] 5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [5,] 6,
punitive damages may be awarded for a willful and material failure
to comply with any provision of this chapter if the failure is
established by clear and convincing evidence.
[5.] 6. Punitive damages may not be awarded against:
(a) The association;
(b) The members of the executive board for acts or omissions
that occur in their official capacity as members of the executive
board; or
(c) The officers of the association for acts or omissions that
occur in their capacity as officers of the association.
[6.] 7. The court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the
prevailing party.
[7.] 8. The civil remedy provided by this section is in addition
to, and not exclusive of, any other available remedy or penalty.
[8.] 9. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the
Commission from taking any disciplinary action against a member
of an executive board pursuant to NRS 116.745 to 116.795,
inclusive.
Sec. 9. NRS 38.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
38.310 1. [No] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, no civil action based upon a claim relating to:
(a) The interpretation, application or enforcement of any
covenants, conditions or restrictions applicable to residential
property or any bylaws, rules or regulations adopted by an
association; or
(b) The procedures used for increasing, decreasing or imposing
additional assessments upon residential property,
 may be commenced in any court in this State unless the action
has been submitted to mediation or, if the parties agree, has been
referred to a program pursuant to the provisions of NRS 38.300 to
38.360, inclusive, and, if the civil action concerns real estate within
a planned community subject to the provisions of chapter 116 of
NRS or real estate within a condominium hotel subject to the
provisions of chapter 116B of NRS, all administrative procedures
specified in any covenants, conditions or restrictions applicable to
the property or in any bylaws, rules and regulations of an
association have been exhausted.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a civil action
for damages brought pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 116.4117.
3. A court shall dismiss any civil action which is commenced
in violation of the provisions of subsection 1.
Sec. 10. NRS 73.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
73.010 1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
a justice of the peace has jurisdiction and may proceed as provided
-
*SB339*

– 13 –
in this chapter and by rules of court in all cases arising in the justice
court for the recovery of money only, where the amount claimed
does not exceed $10,000.
2. In cases brought pursuant to NRS 116.4117, regardless of
the sum sought to be recovered, the justice of the peace may
proceed as provided in this chapter and by rules of the court,
except that the provisions of this chapter related to the awarding
of costs and attorney’s fees do not apply.
3. An action brought pursuant to this chapter must be filed in
one of the following townships as the proper venue for the action:
(a) The township in which the defendant named is a resident,
does business or is employed at the time the cause of action arose or
at the time the complaint is filed; or
(b) In addition to any township described in paragraph (a):
(1) In a case involving injury to the person or property, the
township where the injury was committed.
(2) In a case involving a person who has contracted to
perform an obligation at, or relating to, a particular place, the
township in which the obligation is or was to be performed. For the
purposes of this subparagraph, the township in which the obligation
is incurred shall be deemed to be the township in which the
obligation is or was to be performed, unless there is a special
contract to the contrary.
Sec. 11. 1. This section becomes effective on passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 10, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB339*